Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.152

Job classification revisions, class studies, salary adjustments—Limitations.

(1) The director shall adopt only those job classification revisions, class studies, and salary adjustments under RCW 41.06.157 that:

(a) As defined by the director, are due to documented recruitment or retention difficulties, salary compression or inversion, classification plan maintenance, higher level duties and responsibilities, or inequities; and

(b) Are such that the office of financial management has reviewed the affected agency's fiscal impact statement and has concurred that the affected agency can absorb the biennialized cost of the reclassification, class study, or salary adjustment within the agency's current authorized level of funding for the current fiscal biennium and subsequent fiscal biennia.

(2) This section does not apply to the higher education hospital special pay plan or to any adjustments to the classification plan under RCW 41.06.157 that are due to emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are defined as emergency conditions requiring the establishment of positions necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 410; 2007 c 489 s 1; 2002 c 354 s 241; 2002 c 354 s 240; 1999 c 309 s 914; 1996 c 319 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Severability—1999 c 309: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1999 c 309 s 2001.]

Effective date—1999 c 309: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999, except as provided in section 2002 of this act." [ 1999 c 309 s 2003.]